Maine, session 132, LD1554.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2504 is enacted to read:
§2504. Required sexual harassment prevention training for restaurant employees
1. Required sexual harassment prevention training for restaurant employees.
Every employee of a restaurant is required to receive training approved by the department
regarding sexual harassment prevention. The restaurant shall complete a compliance
checklist under Title 26, section 807, subsection 4. For purposes of this section,
"restaurant" has the same meaning as in Title 28-A, section 2, subsection 15, paragraph Q
and "sexual harassment" has the same meaning as in Title 14, section 6000, subsection 2-A.
2. Violation. If a restaurant is not in compliance with this section upon the expiration
of the restaurant's license under section 2492, the restaurant has 45 days after expiration to
comply with subsection 1. Upon expiration of that 45 days, if the restaurant is not in
compliance with subsection 1, in addition to any other sanction under section 2498, the
department shall deny the renewal of the restaurant's license under Title 22, section 2495.